Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 98.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-614
Lottery operator, defined.

Lottery operator shall mean any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership,
limited liability company, or corporation which operates a lottery on behalf
of a county, city, or village.

A lottery operator shall be a resident of Nebraska or, if a partnership,
limited liability company, or corporation, shall be organized under the laws
of this state as a partnership, formed under the Limited Liability Company
Act or the Nebraska Uniform
Limited Liability Company Act, or incorporated under the Business
Corporation Act.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 55;

Laws 1990, LB 1055, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 114;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 194;

Laws 2010, LB888, § 98.

Business Corporation Act, see section 21-2001.

Limited Liability Company Act, see section 21-2601.

Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, see section 21-101.